Nevada, session 83, SB68.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 641.145 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.145 1. On or before February 1 of each year, the Board
shall submit to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and
Human Services and to the Chair of each regional behavioral health
policy board created by NRS 433.429 a report which must include:
(a) The number of complaints received, investigations
completed, cases dismissed, cases settled and cases for which
hearings were held within the immediately preceding calendar year;
(b) The number of applications for the issuance or renewal of a
license or registration received by the Board during the immediately
preceding calendar year and the number of those applications for
-
*SB68*

– 3 –
which the Board conducted additional review beyond the standard
review regularly conducted by the Board; [and]
(c) The number of applications for the issuance of a license by
endorsement received by the Board pursuant to NRS 641.196 during
the immediately preceding calendar year, the number of those
applications that were denied and the reasons for denial [.] ; and
(d) A narrative description of:
(1) The processes which the Board uses to collect the data
for the information reported in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c);
(2) The reasons for the denials of applications for the
issuance or renewal of licenses and registrations during the
immediately preceding calendar year;
(3) The known reasons for any increase or decrease in the
number of applications for the issuance or renewal of a license or
registration, categorized by type of license or registration, during
the immediately preceding calendar year; and
(4) If known, the location in this State in which each
applicant for licensure or registration during the immediately
preceding calendar year intends to practice.
2. The report submitted pursuant to this section to the Chair of
each regional behavioral health policy board created by NRS
433.429 may be submitted in a written format.
Sec. 2. NRS 641A.183 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641A.183 1. On or before February 1 of each year, the Board
shall submit to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and
Human Services and to the Chair of each regional behavioral health
policy board created by NRS 433.429 a report which must include:
(a) The number of complaints received, investigations
completed, cases dismissed, cases settled and cases for which
hearings were held within the immediately preceding calendar year;
(b) The number of applications for the issuance or renewal of a
license received by the Board during the immediately preceding
calendar year and the number of those applications for which the
Board conducted additional review beyond the standard review
regularly conducted by the Board; [and]
(c) The number of applications for the issuance of a license by
endorsement received by the Board pursuant to NRS 641A.242
during the immediately preceding calendar year, the number of
those applications that were denied and the reasons for denial [.] ;
and
(d) A narrative description of:
(1) The processes which the Board uses to collect the data
for the information reported in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c);
-
*SB68*

– 4 –
(2) The reasons for the denials of applications for the
issuance or renewal of licenses during the immediately preceding
calendar year;
(3) The known reasons for any increase or decrease in the
number of applications for the issuance or renewal of a license,
categorized by type of license, during the immediately preceding
calendar year; and
(4) If known, the location in this State in which each
applicant for licensure during the immediately preceding calendar
year intends to practice.
2. The report submitted pursuant to this section to the Chair of
each regional behavioral health policy board created by NRS
433.429 may be submitted in a written format.
Sec. 3. Chapter 641B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Social Work Licensure Compact is hereby ratified and
entered into, with all other jurisdictions legally joining the
Compact in substantially the form set forth in this section:

SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE COMPACT

SECTION 1: PURPOSE

The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate practice
of Regulated Social Workers by improving public access to
competent Social Work Services. The Compact preserves the
regulatory authority of States to protect public health and safety
through the current system of State licensure.
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
A. Increase public access to Social Work Services;
B. Reduce overly burdensome and duplicative requirements
associated with holding multiple licenses;
C. Enhance the Member States’ ability to protect the public’s
health and safety;
D. Encourage the cooperation of Member States in
regulating multistate practice;
E. Promote mobility and address workforce shortages by
eliminating the necessity for licenses in multiple States by
providing for the mutual recognition of other Member State
licenses;
F. Support military families;
G. Facilitate the exchange of licensure and disciplinary
information among Member States;
H. Authorize all Member States to hold a Regulated Social
Worker accountable for abiding by a Member State’s laws,
-
*SB68*

– 5 –
regulations and applicable professional standards in the Member
State in which the client is located at the time care is rendered;
and
I. Allow for the use of telehealth to facilitate increased access
to regulated Social Work Services.

SECTION 2: DEFINITIONS

As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the
following definitions shall apply:
A. “Active Military Member” means any individual with full-
time duty status in the active armed forces of the United States,
including members of the National Guard and Reserve.
B. “Adverse Action” means any administrative, civil,
equitable or criminal action permitted by a State’s laws which is
imposed by a Licensing Authority or other authority against a
Regulated Social Worker, including actions against an
individual’s license or Multistate Authorization to practice, such
as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the Licensee,
limitation on the Licensee’s practice, or any other Encumbrance
on licensure affecting a Regulated Social Worker’s authorization
to practice, including issuance of a cease and desist action.
C. “Alternative Program” means a non-disciplinary
monitoring or practice remediation process approved by a
Licensing Authority to address practitioners with an impairment.
D. “Charter Member States” - Member States who have
enacted legislation to adopt this Compact where such legislation
predates the effective date of this Compact as described in
Section 14.
E. “Compact Commission” or “Commission” means the
government agency whose membership consists of all States that
have enacted this Compact, which is known as the Social Work
Licensure Compact Commission, as described in Section 10, and
which shall operate as an instrumentality of the Member States.
F. “Current Significant Investigative Information” means:
1. Investigative information that a Licensing Authority,
after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an
opportunity for the Regulated Social Worker to respond, has
reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would
indicate more than a minor infraction as may be defined by the
Commission; or
2. Investigative information that indicates that the
Regulated Social Worker represents an immediate threat to public
health and safety, as may be defined by the Commission,
-
*SB68*

– 6 –
regardless of whether the Regulated Social Worker has been
notified and has had an opportunity to respond.
G. “Data System” means a repository of information about
Licensees, including, continuing education, examination,
licensure, Current Significant Investigative Information,
Disqualifying Event, Multistate License(s) and Adverse Action
information or other information as required by the Commission.
H. “Disqualifying Event” means any Adverse Action or
incident which results in an Encumbrance that disqualifies or
makes the Licensee ineligible to either obtain, retain or renew a
Multistate License.
I. “Domicile” means the jurisdiction in which the Licensee
resides and intends to remain indefinitely.
J. “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or
any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of Social Work
licensed and regulated by a Licensing Authority.
K. “Executive Committee” means a group of delegates
elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers
granted to them by, the Compact and Commission.
L. “Home State” means the Member State that is the
Licensee’s primary Domicile.
M. “Impairment” means a condition(s) that may impair a
practitioner’s ability to engage in full and unrestricted practice as
a Regulated Social Worker without some type of intervention and
may include alcohol and drug dependence, mental health
impairment, and neurological or physical impairments.
N. “Licensee(s)” means an individual who currently holds a
license from a State to practice as a Regulated Social Worker.
O. “Licensing Authority” means the board or agency of a
Member State, or equivalent, that is responsible for the licensing
and regulation of Regulated Social Workers.
P. “Member State” means a state, commonwealth, district or
territory of the United States of America that has enacted this
Compact.
Q. “Multistate Authorization to Practice” means a legally
authorized privilege to practice, which is equivalent to a license,
associated with a Multistate License permitting the practice of
Social Work in a Remote State.
R. “Multistate License” means a license to practice as a
Regulated Social Worker issued by a Home State Licensing
Authority that authorizes the Regulated Social Worker to practice
in all Member States under Multistate Authorization to Practice.
S. “Qualifying National Exam” means a national licensing
examination approved by the Commission.
-
*SB68*

– 7 –
T. “Regulated Social Worker” means any clinical, master’s
or bachelor’s Social Worker licensed by a Member State
regardless of the title used by that Member State.
U. “Remote State” means a Member State other than the
Licensee’s Home State.
V. “Rule(s)” or “Rule(s) of the Commission” means a
regulation or regulations duly promulgated by the Commission, as
authorized by the Compact, that has the force of law.
W. “Single State License” means a Social Work license
issued by any State that authorizes practice only within the issuing
State and does not include Multistate Authorization to Practice in
any Member State.
X. “Social Work” or “Social Work Services” means the
application of social work theory, knowledge, methods, ethics and
the professional use of self to restore or enhance social,
psychosocial, or biopsychosocial functioning of individuals,
couples, families, groups, organizations and communities through
the care and services provided by a Regulated Social Worker as set
forth in the Member State’s statutes and regulations in the State
where the services are being provided.
Y. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district or
territory of the United States of America that regulates the practice
of Social Work.
Z. “Unencumbered License” means a license that authorizes
a Regulated Social Worker to engage in the full and unrestricted
practice of Social Work.

SECTION 3: STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT

A. To be eligible to participate in the Compact, a potential
Member State must currently meet all of the following criteria:
1. License and regulate the practice of Social Work at
either the clinical, master’s or bachelor’s category.
2. Require applicants for licensure to graduate from a
program that is:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the
Licensing Authority;
b. Accredited, or in candidacy by an institution that
subsequently becomes accredited, by an accrediting agency
recognized by either:
i. the Council for Higher Education Accreditation, or
its successor; or
ii. the United States Department of Education; and
c. Corresponds to the licensure sought as outlined in
Section 4.
-
*SB68*

– 8 –
3. Require applicants for clinical licensure to complete a
period of supervised practice.
4. Have a mechanism in place for receiving, investigating,
and adjudicating complaints about Licensees.
B. To maintain membership in the Compact, a Member State
shall:
1. Require that applicants for a Multistate License pass a
Qualifying National Exam for the corresponding category of
Multistate License sought as outlined in Section 4;
2. Participate fully in the Commission’s Data System,
including using the Commission’s unique identifier as defined in
Rules;
3. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of
the Compact and Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability
of Current Significant Investigative Information regarding a
Licensee;
4. Implement procedures for considering the criminal
history records of applicants for a Multistate License. Such
procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other
biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of
obtaining an applicant’s criminal history record information from
the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible
for retaining that State’s criminal records;
5. Comply with the Rules of the Commission;
6. Require an applicant to obtain or retain a license in the
Home State and meet the Home State’s qualifications for
licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as all other applicable
Home State Laws;
7. Authorize a Licensee holding a Multistate License in any
Member State to practice in accordance with the terms of the
Compact and Rules of the Commission; and
8. Designate a delegate to participate in the Commission
meetings.
C. A Member State meeting the requirements of Section 3.A
and 3.B of this Compact shall designate the categories of Social
Work licensure that are eligible for issuance of a Multistate
License for applicants in such Member State. To the extent that
any Member State does not meet the requirements for
participation in the Compact at any particular category of Social
Work licensure, such Member State may choose, but is not
obligated to, issue a Multistate License to applicants that otherwise
meet the requirements of Section 4 for issuance of a Multistate
License in such category or categories of licensure.
D. The Home State may charge a fee for granting the
Multistate License.
-
*SB68*

– 9 –
SECTION 4: SOCIAL WORKER PARTICIPATION
IN THE COMPACT

A. To be eligible for a Multistate License under the terms and
provisions of the Compact, an applicant, regardless of category,
must:
1. Hold or be eligible for an active, Unencumbered License
in the Home State.
2. Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee, for the
Multistate License.
3. Submit, in connection with an application for a
Multistate License, fingerprints or other biometric data for the
purpose of obtaining criminal history record information from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for
retaining that State’s criminal records.
4. Notify the Home State of any Adverse Action,
Encumbrance or restriction on any professional license taken by
any Member State or non-Member State within 30 days from the
date the action is taken.
5. Meet any continuing competence requirements
established by the Home State.
6. Abide by the laws, regulations and applicable standards
in the Member State where the client is located at the time care is
rendered.
B. An applicant for a clinical-category Multistate License
must meet all of the following requirements:
1. Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be
satisfied by either:
a. Passage of a clinical-category Qualifying National
Exam;
b. Licensure of the applicant in their Home State at the
clinical category, beginning prior to such time as a Qualifying
National Exam was required by the Home State and accompanied
by a period of continuous Social Work licensure thereafter, all of
which may be further governed by the Rules of the Commission;
or
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing
competency requirements which the Commission may determine
by Rule.
2. Attain at least a master’s degree in Social Work from a
program that is:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the
Licensing Authority; and
-
*SB68*

– 10 –
b. Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently
becomes accredited, by an accrediting agency recognized by
either:
i. the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or
its successor; or
ii. the United States Department of Education.
3. Fulfill a practice requirement, which shall be satisfied by
demonstrating completion of either:
a. A period of postgraduate supervised clinical practice
equal to a minimum of three thousand hours;
b. A minimum of two years of full-time postgraduate
supervised clinical practice; or
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing practice
requirements which the Commission may determine by Rule.
C. An applicant for a master’s-category Multistate License
must meet all of the following requirements:
1. Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be
satisfied by either:
a. Passage of a master’s-category Qualifying National
Exam;
b. Licensure of the applicant in their Home State at the
master’s category, beginning prior to such time as a Qualifying
National Exam was required by the Home State at the master’s
category and accompanied by a continuous period of Social Work
licensure thereafter, all of which may be further governed by the
Rules of the Commission; or
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing
competency requirements which the Commission may determine
by Rule.
2. Attain at least a master’s degree in Social Work from a
program that is:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the
Licensing Authority; and
b. Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently
becomes accredited, by an accrediting agency recognized by
either:
i. the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or
its successor; or
ii. the United States Department of Education.
D. An applicant for a bachelor’s-category Multistate License
must meet all of the following requirements:
1. Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be
satisfied by either:
a. Passage of a bachelor’s-category Qualifying National
Exam;
-
*SB68*

– 11 –
b. Licensure of the applicant in their Home State at the
bachelor’s category, beginning prior to such time as a Qualifying
National Exam was required by the Home State and accompanied
by a period of continuous Social Work licensure thereafter, all of
which may be further governed by the Rules of the Commission;
or
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing
competency requirements which the Commission may determine
by Rule.
2. Attain at least a bachelor’s degree in Social Work from a
program that is:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the
Licensing Authority; and
b. Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently
becomes accredited, by an accrediting agency recognized by
either:
i. the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or
its successor; or
ii. the United States Department of Education.
E. The Multistate License for a Regulated Social Worker is
subject to the renewal requirements of the Home State. The
Regulated Social Worker must maintain compliance with the
requirements of Section 4(A) to be eligible to renew a Multistate
License.
F. The Regulated Social Worker’s services in a Remote State
are subject to that Member State’s regulatory authority. A Remote
State may, in accordance with due process and that Member
State’s laws, remove a Regulated Social Worker’s Multistate
Authorization to Practice in the Remote State for a specific period
of time, impose fines and take any other necessary actions to
protect the health and safety of its citizens.
G. If a Multistate License is encumbered, the Regulated
Social Worker’s Multistate Authorization to Practice shall be
deactivated in all Remote States until the Multistate License is no
longer encumbered.
H. If a Multistate Authorization to Practice is encumbered in
a Remote State, the Regulated Social Worker’s Multistate
Authorization to Practice may be deactivated in that State until the
Multistate Authorization to Practice is no longer encumbered.

SECTION 5: ISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE

A. Upon receipt of an application for a Multistate license, the
Home State Licensing Authority shall determine the applicant’s
-
*SB68*

– 12 –
eligibility for a Multistate License in accordance with Section 4 of
this Compact.
B. If such applicant is eligible pursuant to Section 4 of this
Compact, the Home State Licensing Authority shall issue a
Multistate License that authorizes the applicant or Regulated
Social Worker to practice in all Member States under a Multistate
Authorization to Practice.
C. Upon issuance of a Multistate License, the Home State
Licensing Authority shall designate whether the Regulated Social
Worker holds a Multistate License in the Bachelor’s, Master’s or
Clinical category of Social Work.
D. A Multistate License issued by a Home State to a resident
in that state shall be recognized by all Compact Member States as
authorizing Social Work Practice under a Multistate
Authorization to Practice corresponding to each category of
licensure regulated in each Member State.

SECTION 6: AUTHORITY OF INTERSTATE
COMPACT COMMISSION AND MEMBER
STATE LICENSING AUTHORITIES

A. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission,
shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability
of a Member State to enact and enforce laws, regulations, or other
Rules related to the practice of Social Work in that State, where
those laws, regulations, or other rules are not inconsistent with the
provisions of this Compact.
B. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements
established by a Member State for the issuance of a Single State
License.
C. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission,
shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability
of a Member State to take Adverse Action against a Licensee’s
Single State License to practice Social Work in that State.
D. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the
Commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way
reduce the ability of a Remote State to take Adverse Action against
a Licensee’s Multistate Authorization to Practice in that State.
E. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission,
shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability
of a Licensee’s Home State to take Adverse Action against a
Licensee’s Multistate License based upon information provided by
a Remote State.
-
*SB68*

– 13 –
SECTION 7: REISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE
LICENSE BY A NEW HOME STATE

A. A Licensee can hold a Multistate License, issued by their
Home State, in only one Member State at any given time.
B. If a Licensee changes their Home State by moving
between two Member States:
1. The Licensee shall immediately apply for the reissuance
of their Multistate License in their new Home State. The Licensee
shall pay all applicable fees and notify the prior Home State in
accordance with the Rules of the Commission.
2. Upon receipt of an application to reissue a Multistate
License, the new Home State shall verify that the Multistate
License is active, unencumbered and eligible for reissuance under
the terms of the Compact and the Rules of the Commission. The
Multistate License issued by the prior Home State will be
deactivated and all Member States notified in accordance with the
applicable Rules adopted by the Commission.
3. Prior to the reissuance of the Multistate License, the new
Home State shall conduct procedures for considering the criminal
history records of the Licensee. Such procedures shall include the
submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information
by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal
history record information from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that State’s
criminal records.
4. If required for initial licensure, the new Home State may
require completion of jurisprudence requirements in the new
Home State.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if
a Licensee does not meet the requirements set forth in this
Compact for the reissuance of a Multistate License by the new
Home State, then the Licensee shall be subject to the new Home
State requirements for the issuance of a Single State License in
that State.
C. If a Licensee changes their primary State of residence by
moving from a Member State to a non-Member State, or from a
non-Member State to a Member State, then the Licensee shall be
subject to the State requirements for the issuance of a Single State
License in the new Home State.
D. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a Licensee’s
ability to hold a Single State License in multiple States; however,
for the purposes of this Compact, a Licensee shall have only one
Home State and only one Multistate License.
-
*SB68*

– 14 –
E. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with the
requirements established by a Member State for the issuance of a
Single State License.

SECTION 8: MILITARY FAMILIES

An Active Military Member or their spouse shall designate a
Home State where the individual has a Multistate License. The
individual may retain their Home State designation during the
period the service member is on active duty.

SECTION 9: ADVERSE ACTIONS

A. In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, a
Remote State shall have the authority, in accordance with existing
State due process law, to:
1. Take Adverse Action against a Regulated Social
Worker’s Multistate Authorization to Practice only within that
Member State, and issue subpoenas for both hearings and
investigations that require the attendance and testimony of
witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued
by a Licensing Authority in a Member State for the attendance
and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from
another Member State shall be enforced in the latter State by any
court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and
procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in
proceedings pending before it. The issuing Licensing Authority
shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees
required by the service statutes of the State in which the witnesses
or evidence are located.
2. Only the Home State shall have the power to take
Adverse Action against a Regulated Social Worker’s Multistate
License.
B. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Home State
shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received
from a Member State as it would if the conduct had occurred
within the Home State. In so doing, the Home State shall apply its
own State laws to determine appropriate action.
C. The Home State shall complete any pending investigations
of a Regulated Social Worker who changes their Home State
during the course of the investigations. The Home State shall also
have the authority to take appropriate action(s) and shall promptly
report the conclusions of the investigations to the administrator of
the Data System. The administrator of the Data System shall
promptly notify the new Home State of any Adverse Actions.
-
*SB68*

– 15 –
D. A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State law, may
recover from the affected Regulated Social Worker the costs of
investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any Adverse
Action taken against that Regulated Social Worker.
E. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on the
factual findings of another Member State, provided that the
Member State follows its own procedures for taking the Adverse
Action.
F. Joint Investigations:
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by
its respective Social Work practice act or other applicable State
law, any Member State may participate with other Member States
in joint investigations of Licensees.
2. Member States shall share any investigative, litigation, or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual
investigation initiated under the Compact.
G. If Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against the
Multistate License of a Regulated Social Worker, the Regulated
Social Worker’s Multistate Authorization to Practice in all other
Member States shall be deactivated until all Encumbrances have
been removed from the Multistate License. All Home State
disciplinary orders that impose Adverse Action against the license
of a Regulated Social Worker shall include a statement that the
Regulated Social Worker’s Multistate Authorization to Practice is
deactivated in all Member States until all conditions of the
decision, order or agreement are satisfied.
H. If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall promptly
notify the administrator of the Data System. The administrator of
the Data System shall promptly notify the Home State and all
other Member States of any Adverse Actions by Remote States.
I. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State’s
decision that participation in an Alternative Program may be used
in lieu of Adverse Action.
J. Nothing in this Compact shall authorize a Member State to
demand the issuance of subpoenas for attendance and testimony
of witnesses or the production of evidence from another Member
State for lawful actions within that Member State.
K. Nothing in this Compact shall authorize a Member State
to impose discipline against a Regulated Social Worker who holds
a Multistate Authorization to Practice for lawful actions within
another Member State.
-
*SB68*

– 16 –
SECTION 10: ESTABLISHMENT OF SOCIAL WORK
LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION

A. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a
joint government agency whose membership consists of all
Member States that have enacted the Compact, known as the
Social Work Licensure Compact Commission. The Commission is
an instrumentality of the Compact States acting jointly and not an
instrumentality of any one State. The Commission shall come into
existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set forth
in Section 14.
B. Membership, Voting and Meetings:
1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1)
delegate selected by that Member State’s State Licensing
Authority.
2. The delegate shall be either:
a. A current member of the State Licensing Authority at
the time of appointment, who is a Regulated Social Worker or
public member of the State Licensing Authority; or
b. An administrator of the State Licensing Authority or
their designee.
3. The Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a term
of office for delegates and may by Rule or bylaw establish term
limits.
4. The Commission may recommend the removal or
suspension of any delegate from office.
5. A Member State’s State Licensing Authority shall fill any
vacancy of its delegate occurring on the Commission within 60
days of the vacancy.
6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters
before the Commission requiring a vote by Commission delegates.
7. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as
provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates to
meet by telecommunication, videoconference, or other means of
communication.
8. The Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the
bylaws. The Commission may meet by telecommunication, video
conference or other similar electronic means.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest
policies;
3. Establish and amend Rules and bylaws;
-
*SB68*

– 17 –
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the
bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact, the Commission’s Rules and the
bylaws;
6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any State
Licensing Board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not
be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to
a Member State as the authenticated business records of the
Commission, and designate an agent to do so on the Commission’s
behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a Member State;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate
authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and establish
the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to
conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel and other related
personnel matters;
12. Assess and collect fees;
13. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants
of money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials
and services, and receive, utilize and dispose of the same; provided
that at all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of
impropriety or conflict of interest;
14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve or use any
property, real, personal or mixed, or any undivided interest
therein;
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, or
mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money;
18. Appoint committees, including standing committees,
composed of members, State regulators, State legislators or their
representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other
interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the
bylaws;
19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate
with, law enforcement agencies;
-
*SB68*

– 18 –
20. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including
a chair and a vice chair;
21. Determine whether a State’s adopted language is
materially different from the model compact language such that
the State would not qualify for participation in the Compact; and
22. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact.
D. The Executive Committee:
1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on
behalf of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact.
The powers, duties and responsibilities of the Executive
Committee shall include:
a. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration
of the Compact, including enforcement and compliance with the
provisions of the Compact, its Rules and bylaws, and such other
duties as deemed necessary;
b. Recommend to the Commission changes to the Rules
or bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to
Compact Member States, fees charged to Licensees and other fees;
c. Ensure Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, including by contract;
d. Prepare and recommend the budget;
e. Maintain financial records on behalf of the
Commission;
f. Monitor Compact compliance of Member States and
provide compliance reports to the Commission;
g. Establish additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercise the powers and duties of the Commission
during the interim between Commission meetings, except for
adopting or amending Rules, adopting or amending bylaws and
exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the
Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the
Commission.
2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of up to
eleven (11) members:
a. The chair and vice chair of the Commission shall be
voting members of the Executive Committee.
b. The Commission shall elect five (5) voting members
from the current membership of the Commission.
c. Up to four (4) ex-officio, nonvoting members from
four (4) recognized national Social Work organizations.
d. The ex-officio members will be selected by their
respective organizations.
-
*SB68*

– 19 –
3. The Commission may remove any member of the
Executive Committee as provided in the Commission’s bylaws.
4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the
public, except that the Executive Committee may meet in a closed,
non-public meeting as provided in subsection F.2 below.
b. The Executive Committee shall give seven (7) days’
notice of its meetings, posted on its website and as determined to
provide notice to persons with an interest in the business of the
Commission.
c. The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting
in accordance with subsection F.1.b. below.
E. The Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member
States an annual report.
F. Meetings of the Commission:
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the
Commission may meet in a closed non-public meeting as provided
in subsection F.2 below.
a. Public notice for all meetings of the full Commission
shall be given in the same manner as required under the
Rulemaking provisions in Section 12, except that the Commission
may hold a special meeting as provided in subsection F.1.b below.
b. The Commission may hold a special meeting when it
must meet to conduct emergency business by giving 48 hours’
notice to all commissioners, on the Commission’s website, and
other means as provided in the Commission’s Rules. The
Commission’s legal counsel shall certify that the Commission’s
need to meet qualifies as an emergency.
2. The Commission or the Executive Committee or other
committees of the Commission may convene in a closed, non-
public meeting for the Commission or Executive Committee or
other committees of the Commission to receive legal advice or to
discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its
obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by the
Commission or by a Member State’s Licensing Authority;
d. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
-
*SB68*

– 20 –
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information
that is privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure
would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal
privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement
purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports
prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other
committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or Member State law; or
l. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by
Rule.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the
presiding officer shall state that the meeting will be closed and
reference each relevant exempting provision, and such reference
shall be recorded in the minutes.
4. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and
clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall
provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefor, including a description of the views expressed.
All documents considered in connection with an action shall be
identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a
majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Commission:
1. The Commission shall pay or provide for the payment of
the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and
ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate
revenue sources as provided in subsection C(13).
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each Member State and impose fees on Licensees
of Member States to whom it grants a Multistate License to cover
the cost of the operations and activities of the Commission and its
staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its
annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not
provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment
amount for Member States shall be allocated based upon a
formula that the Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall
-
*SB68*

– 21 –
the Commission pledge the credit of any of the Member States,
except by and with the authority of the Member State.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the
Commission shall be subject to the financial review and
accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all
receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission
shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or
licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review
shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the
Commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification:
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any
claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other
civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom
the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any
damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement of
insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any way
compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the
Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising
out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission that the
person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be
construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel
at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
member, officer, executive director, employee, and representative
of the Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment
obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such
-
*SB68*

– 22 –
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities,
provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not
result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any Licensee for professional malpractice or
misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other
applicable State laws.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a Member State’s state action immunity or
state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims
under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal
antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a
waiver of sovereign immunity by the Member States or by the
Commission.

SECTION 11: DATA SYSTEM

A. The Commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated Data
System.
B. The Commission shall assign each applicant for a
Multistate License a unique identifier, as determined by the Rules
of the Commission.
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the
contrary, a Member State shall submit a uniform data set to the
Data System on all individuals to whom this Compact is applicable
as required by the Rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a Licensee and information
related thereto;
4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative
Program participation, the beginning and ending dates of such
participation, and other information related to such participation
not made confidential under Member State law;
5. Any denial of application for licensure and the reason(s)
for such denial;
6. The presence of Current Significant Investigative
Information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration
of this Compact or the protection of the public, as determined by
the Rules of the Commission.
-
*SB68*

– 23 –
D. The records and information provided to a Member State
pursuant to this Compact or through the Data System, when
certified by the Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute
the authenticated business records of the Commission, and shall
be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant
judicial, quasi-judicial or administrative proceedings in a Member
State.
E. Current Significant Investigative Information pertaining
to a Licensee in any Member State will only be available to other
Member States. It is the responsibility of the Member States to
report any Adverse Action against a Licensee and to monitor the
database to determine whether Adverse Action has been taken
against a Licensee. Adverse Action information pertaining to a
Licensee in any Member State will be available to any other
Member State.
F. Member States contributing information to the Data
System may designate information that may not be shared with the
public without the express permission of the contributing State.
G. Any information submitted to the Data System that is
subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the
Member State contributing the information shall be removed from
the Data System.

SECTION 12: RULEMAKING

A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in
order to effectively and efficiently implement and administer the
purposes and provisions of the Compact. A Rule shall be invalid
and have no force or effect only if a court of competent
jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid because the Commission
exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the
scope and purposes of the Compact or the powers granted
hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
B. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law
in each Member State, provided, however, that where the Rules of
the Commission conflict with the laws of the Member State that
establish the Member State’s laws, regulations, and applicable
standards that govern the practice of Social Work as held by a
court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Commission shall
be ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
C. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Section and the Rules
adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding on the day
following adoption or the date specified in the rule or amendment,
whichever is later.
-
*SB68*

– 24 –
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States
rejects a Rule or portion of a Rule, by enactment of a statute or
resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact within
four (4) years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule
shall have no further force and effect in any Member State.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of
the Commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission
shall hold a public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and
written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission,
and at least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the
Commission will hold a public hearing on the proposed Rule, the
Commission shall provide a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly
accessible platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the
Commission’s notices of proposed rulemaking; and
3. In such other way(s) as the Commission may by Rule
specify.
H. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date and location of the public hearing at
which the Commission will hear public comments on the proposed
Rule and, if different, the time, date and location of the meeting
where the Commission will consider and vote on the proposed
Rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video
conference, or other electronic means, the Commission shall
include the mechanism for access to the hearing in the Notice of
Proposed Rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any
interested person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit
written comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and
all written comments and documents received by the Commission
in response to the proposed Rule shall be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the
convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
section.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members,
take final action on the proposed Rule based on the Rulemaking
record and the full text of the Rule.
-
*SB68*

– 25 –
1. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed
Rule, provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of
the proposed Rule.
2. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the
reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well
as reasons for substantive changes not made that were
recommended by commenters.
3. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective
date for the Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in Section
12.L, the effective date of the Rule shall be no sooner than 30 days
after issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the Rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
Commission may consider and adopt an emergency Rule with 48
hours’ notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the
usual Rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in this
section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as
reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after
the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of this provision,
an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately in
order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is
established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the
Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule for
purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format,
errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any
revisions shall be posted on the website of the Commission. The
revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of
thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only
on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a
Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the
Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge
is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the
revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
approval of the Commission.
N. No Member State’s rulemaking requirements shall apply
under this Compact.
-
*SB68*

– 26 –
SECTION 13: OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE
RESOLUTION AND ENFORCEMENT

A. Oversight:
1. The executive and judicial branches of State government
in each Member State shall enforce this Compact and take all
actions necessary and appropriate to implement the Compact.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this Compact, venue is
proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission
shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent
jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is
located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional
defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in
alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall
affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action
against a Licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct or
any such similar matter.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or
interpretation of the Compact and shall have standing to intervene
in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the
Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order
void as to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination:
1. If the Commission determines that a Member State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities
under this Compact or the promulgated Rules, the Commission
shall provide written notice to the defaulting State. The notice of
default shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing
the default, and any other action that the Commission may take,
and shall offer training and specific technical assistance
regarding the default.
2. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of
default to the other Member States.
C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting
State may be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative
vote of a majority of the delegates of the Member States, and all
rights, privileges and benefits conferred on that State by this
Compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A
cure of the default does not relieve the offending State of
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
D. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be
imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have
been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be
given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and
-
*SB68*

– 27 –
minority leaders of the defaulting State’s legislature, the
defaulting State’s State Licensing Authority and each of the
Member State’s State Licensing Authority.
E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the
effective date of termination, including obligations that extend
beyond the effective date of termination.
F. Upon the termination of a State’s membership from this
Compact, that State shall immediately provide notice to all
Licensees within that State of such termination. The terminated
State shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to
this Compact for a minimum of six (6) months after the date of
said notice of termination.
G. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State
that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the
Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the Commission
and the defaulting State.
H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the
Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District
of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
I. Dispute Resolution:
1. Upon request by a Member State, the Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise
among Member States and between Member and non-Member
States.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes, as
appropriate.
J. Enforcement:
1. By majority vote as provided by Rule, the Commission
may initiate legal action against a Member State in default in the
United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Commission has its principal offices to
enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive
relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary,
the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall
not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The Commission
may pursue any other remedies available under federal or the
defaulting Member State’s law.
2. A Member State may initiate legal action against the
Commission in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia
-
*SB68*

– 28 –
or the federal district where the Commission has its principal
offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact
and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. No person other than a Member State shall enforce this
Compact against the Commission.

SECTION 14: EFFECTIVE DATE,
WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT

A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which
the Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member
State.
1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the
Commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of
the first seven Member States (“Charter Member States”) to
determine if the statute enacted by each such Charter Member
State is materially different than the model Compact statute.
a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to
be materially different from the model Compact statute shall be
entitled to the default process set forth in Section 13.
b. If any Member State is later found to be in default, or
is terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the Commission
shall remain in existence and the Compact shall remain in effect
even if the number of Member States should be less than seven.
2. Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the
seven initial Charter Member States shall be subject to the process
set forth in Section 10(C)(21) to determine if their enactments are
materially different from the model Compact statute and whether
they qualify for participation in the Compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact
prior to the effective date of the Compact or the Commission
coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the
Commission unless specifically repudiated by the Commission.
4. Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the
Commission’s initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be
subject to the Rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which
the Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has been
previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force
and effect of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that
State.
-
*SB68*

– 29 –
B. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by
enacting a statute repealing the same.
1. A Member State’s withdrawal shall not take effect until
180 days after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement
of the withdrawing State’s Licensing Authority to comply with the
investigative and Adverse Action reporting requirements of this
Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this
Compact, a State shall immediately provide notice of such
withdrawal to all Licensees within that State. Notwithstanding any
subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing
State shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to
this Compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date of such
notice of withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative
arrangement between a Member State and a non-Member State
that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
D. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No
amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding
upon any Member State until it is enacted into the laws of all
Member States.

SECTION 15: CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

A. This Compact and the Commission’s rulemaking authority
shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes,
implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions of
the Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation
of Rules shall not be construed to limit the Commission’s
rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable, and if
any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Compact is held
by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the
constitution of any Member State, a State seeking participation in
the Compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to
any government, agency, person or circumstance is held to be
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity
of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof to
any other government, agency, person or circumstance shall not
be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, the
Commission may deny a State’s participation in the Compact or,
in accordance with the requirements of Section 13.B, terminate a
-
*SB68*

– 30 –
Member State’s participation in the Compact if it determines that
a constitutional requirement of a Member State is a material
departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be
held to be contrary to the constitution of any Member State, the
Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining
Member States and in full force and effect as to the Member State
affected as to all severable matters.

SECTION 16: CONSISTENT EFFECT AND
CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS

A. A Licensee providing services in a Remote State under a
Multistate Authorization to Practice shall adhere to the laws and
regulations, including laws, regulations, and applicable standards,
of the Remote State where the client is located at the time care is
rendered.
B. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of
any other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the
Compact.
C. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements
in a Member State in conflict with the Compact are superseded to
the extent of the conflict.
D. All permissible agreements between the Commission and
the Member States are binding in accordance with their terms.
Sec. 4. NRS 641B.165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641B.165 1. On or before February 1 of each year, the Board
shall submit to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and
Human Services and to the Chair of each regional behavioral health
policy board created by NRS 433.429 a report which must include:
(a) The number of complaints received, investigations
completed, cases dismissed, cases settled and cases for which
hearings were held within the immediately preceding calendar year;
(b) The number of applications for the issuance or renewal of a
license received by the Board during the immediately preceding
calendar year and the number of those applications for which the
Board conducted additional review beyond the standard review
regularly conducted by the Board; [and]
(c) The number of applications for the issuance of a license by
endorsement received by the Board pursuant to NRS 641B.272
during the immediately preceding calendar year, the number of
those applications that were denied and the reasons for denial [.] ;
and
(d) A narrative description of:
(1) The processes which the Board uses to collect the data
for the information reported in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c);
-
*SB68*

– 31 –
(2) The reasons for the denials of applications for the
issuance or renewal of licenses during the immediately preceding
calendar year;
(3) The known reasons for any increase or decrease in the
number of applications for the issuance or renewal of a license,
categorized by type of license, during the immediately preceding
calendar year; and
(4) If known, the location in this State in which each
applicant for licensure during the immediately preceding calendar
year intends to practice.
2. The report submitted pursuant to this section to the Chair of
each regional behavioral policy board created by NRS 433.429 may
be submitted in a written format.
Sec. 5. NRS 641C.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641C.230 1. On or before February 1 of each year, the Board
shall submit to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and
Human Services and to the Chair of each regional behavioral health
policy board created by NRS 433.429 a report which must include:
(a) The number of complaints received, investigations
completed, cases dismissed, cases settled and cases for which
hearings were held within the immediately preceding calendar year;
(b) The number of applications for the issuance or renewal of a
license or certificate received by the Board during the immediately
preceding calendar year and the number of those applications for
which the Board conducted additional review beyond the standard
review regularly conducted by the Board; [and]
(c) The number of applications for the issuance of a license or
certificate by endorsement received by the Board pursuant to NRS
641C.3306, 641C.356, 641C.396 and 641C.433 during the
immediately preceding calendar year, the number of those
applications that were denied and the reasons for denial [.] ; and
(d) A narrative description of:
(1) The processes which the Board uses to collect the data
for the information reported in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c);
(2) The reasons for the denials of applications for the
issuance or renewal of licenses and certificates during the
immediately preceding calendar year;
(3) The known reasons for any increase or decrease in the
number of applications for the issuance or renewal of a license or
certificate, categorized by type of license or certificate, during the
immediately preceding calendar year; and
(4) If known, the location in this State in which each
applicant for licensure or certification during the immediately
preceding calendar year intends to practice.
-
*SB68*

– 32 –
2. The report submitted pursuant to this section to the Chair of
each regional behavioral health policy board created by NRS
433.429 may be submitted in a written format.
Sec. 6. The amendatory provisions of sections 1, 2, 4 and 5 of
this act do not apply to the report required to be submitted pursuant
to NRS 641.145, 641A.183, 641B.165 or 641C.230, as applicable,
on or before February 1, 2026. Thereafter, each subsequent report
required by NRS 641.145, 641A.183, 641B.165 or 641C.230 must
comply with the amendatory provisions of sections 1, 2, 4 and 5 of
this act, as applicable.
Sec. 7. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 8. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB68*